src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NI-faocha
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:faocha^F^C     Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:faochan^F^G        Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:faocha     Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:faochin^C      Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Weak+Pl:faochan^G Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:faochan        Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-olann
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:olann^F^C      Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:olla^F^G       Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:olann      Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:olanna^C       Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Weak+Pl:olann^G   Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:olanna     Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-spré
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:spré^F^C       Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:spréite^F^G        Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:spré       Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-sail
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:sail^F^C       Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:saileach^F^G       Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:sail       Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:saileacha^C        Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Weak+Pl:saileach^G    Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:saileacha      Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-deoch
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:deoch^F^C      Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:dí^F^G     Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:deoch      Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:deochanna^C        Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong+Pl:deochanna^G Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:deochanna      Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-abhainn
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:abhainn^F^C        Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:abha^F^C       Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:abhann^F^G     Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:abhainn        Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:aibhneacha^C       Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong+Pl:aibhneacha^G    Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:aibhneacha     Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-bráid
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:bráid^F^C      Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:brád^F^G       Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:bráid      Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:bráide^C       Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong+Pl:bráide^G    Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:bráide     Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-cuigeann
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:cuigeann^F^C       Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:cuiginne^F^G       Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:cuigeann       Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:cuigne^C       Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong+Pl:cuigne^G    Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:cuigne     Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-fiacail
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:fiacail^F^C        Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:fiacaile^F^G       Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:fiacail        Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:fiacla^C       Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong+Pl:fiacla^G    Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:fiacla     Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-roinn
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:roinn^F^C      Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:ranna^F^G      Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:roinn          Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:ranna^C        Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Weak+Pl:ranna^G       Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:rann       Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-Roinn
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:Roinn^F^C      Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:Ranna^F^G      Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:Roinn          Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:Ranna^C        Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Weak+Pl:Ranna^G       Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:Rann       Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-obair
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:obair^F^C      Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:oibre^F^G      Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:obair          Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:oibreacha^C        Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong+Pl:oibreacha^G Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:oibreacha      Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-bean
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:bean^F^C       Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:mná^F^G        Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:bean           Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:mná^C          Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong+Pl:ban^G       Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:mná        Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Dat+Sg:mnaoi          #;
+Noun+Fem+Dat+Sg+Len:mhnaoi     #;

LEXICON NI-bó
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:bó^F^C     Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:bó^F^G     Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:bó         Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:ba^C           Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Weak+Pl:bó^G      Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:ba     Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-codladh
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:codladh^F^C        Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:codlata^F^G        Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:codladh            Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-foireann
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:foireann^F^C       Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:foirne^F^G     Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:foireann           Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:foirne^C           Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong+Pl:foirne^G        Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:foirne     Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-deirfiúr
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:deirfiúr^F^C       Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:deirféar^F^G       Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:deirfiúr           Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:deirfiúracha^C         Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong+Pl:deirfiúracha^G      Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:deirfiúracha       Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-leaba
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:leaba^F^C      Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:leapa^F^G      Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:leaba          Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:leapacha^C         Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong+Pl:leapacha^G      Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:leapacha       Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-mí
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:mí^F^C     Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:míosa^F^G      Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:mí         Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:míonna^C           Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong+Pl:míonna^G        Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:míonna     Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-talamhF
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:talamh^F^C     Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:talún^F^G      Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:talamh         Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:tailte^C           Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong+Pl:tailte^G        Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:tailte     Voc-initial;


LEXICON NI-iath
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:iath^F^C       Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:iath^F^G       Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:iaithe         Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:iatha^C        Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Weak+Pl:iath^G        Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:iatha      Voc-initial;
!==========================================================================
! CONTINUATION CLASSES MASCULINE
!==========================================================================
LEXICON NI-léana
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:léana^M^C     Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:léana^M^G     Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:léana     Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:léanta^C      Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:léanta^G   Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:léanta        Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-filleadh
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:filleadh^M^C      Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:fillidh^M^G       Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:filleadh      Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:fillteacha^C      Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:fillteacha^G   Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:fillteacha        Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-ministir
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:ministir^M^C      Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:ministir^M^G      Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:ministir      Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:ministrí^C        Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:ministrí^G Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:ministrí      Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-máistir
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:máistir^M^C       Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:máistir^M^G       Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:máistir       Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:máistrí^C     Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:máistrí^G  Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:máistrí       Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-tritheamh
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:tritheamh^M^C     Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:trithimh^M^G      Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:tritheamh     Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:trithí^C      Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:trithí^G   Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:trithí        Voc-initial;
