src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounsIrregular
bean:		NI-bean;
spéirbhean:spéir		NI-bean;
stáidbhean:stáid		NI-bean;
ógbhean:óg		NI-bean;
bó:		NI-bó;
foireann:	NI-foireann;
deirfiúr:	NI-deirfiúr;
leaba:		NI-leaba;
mí:		NI-mí;
talamh:		NI-talamhF;
codladh: 	NI-codladh;	 ! gs -ata sleep, ~
neamhchodladh:neamh^CB 	NI-codladh;	 ! insomnia ~
obair:			NI-obair;
drochobair:droch	NI-obair;
ragobair:rag		NI-obair;
tascobair:tasc		NI-obair;
roinn:			NI-roinn;
lónroinn:lón			NI-roinn;
toghroinn:togh			NI-roinn;
mór-roinn:mór-			NI-roinn;
fiacail:		NI-fiacail;
diúlfhiacail:diúl^CB	NI-fiacail;
starrfhiacail:starr^CB	NI-fiacail;
cuigeann:		NI-cuigeann;
bráid:			NI-bráid;
abhainn:		NI-abhainn;
craobh-abhainn:craobh-^CB		NI-abhainn;
deoch:			NI-deoch;
sail:			NI-sail;
spré:			NI-spré; ! spread, splay
olann:		NI-olann;
líonolann:líon		NI-olann;	!lint
faocha:		NI-faocha;
filleadh:	NI-filleadh;
léana:		NI-léana;
máistir:	NI-máistir;
pámháistir:pá^CB	NI-máistir;
tritheamh:	NI-tritheamh;
ministir:	NI-ministir;
iath:		NI-iath;
